Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.047

Minimum medical and health standards—Exemptions—Employer may adopt higher standards.

Nothing in RCW 41.26.035, 41.26.045 and 41.26.046 shall apply to any firefighters or law enforcement officers who are employed as such on or before August 1, 1971, as long as they continue in such employment; nor to promotional appointments after becoming a member in the police or fire department of any employer nor to the reemployment of a law enforcement officer or firefighter by the same or a different employer within six months after the termination of his or her employment, nor to the reinstatement of a law enforcement officer or firefighter who has been on military or disability leave, disability retirement status, or leave of absence status. Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to prevent any employer from adopting higher medical and health standards than those which are adopted by the *retirement board.

[ 2012 c 117 s 42; 1972 ex.s. c 131 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Powers, duties, and functions of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement board were transferred to the director of retirement systems by RCW 41.26.051, which has been decodified. See Table of Disposition of Former RCW Sections.

Severability—1972 ex.s. c 131: See note following RCW 41.26.030.

Purpose—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 257: See notes following RCW 41.26.030.